District of Columbia statutes.
23-107

Discharge or acquittal of joint defendant during trial in order to be witness.

(a)

When two or more persons are jointly indicted or charged by information, or charged by separate indictments or informations which have been joined for trial, the court may, with the consent of the prosecuting authority, direct that a defendant who has not gone into his defense be discharged so that he may be a witness for the prosecution.

(b)

When two or more persons are jointly tried, a person desiring that another defendant testify on his behalf may request a judgment of acquittal on behalf of such defendant, which the court shall consider in the same manner as a motion made by such defendant.

(c)

At the request of a defendant who wishes to testify on behalf of another person with whom he is jointly tried, if the evidence against such defendant is sufficient to be submitted to the jury and if such other person consents, the court may submit the case concerning such defendant to the jury separately so that his testimony may not be considered against him by such jury.

(d)

A discharge granted pursuant to subsection (a), or an acquittal secured pursuant to subsection (b) or (c), shall be a bar to another prosecution for the same offense of the defendant so discharged or acquitted.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 607, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-107.
1973 Ed., § 23-107.